Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.070

License renewal—Continuing education—Rules.

Every person practicing chiropractic shall, as a prerequisite to renewal of license, submit to the secretary at the time of application therefor, satisfactory proof showing attendance of at least twenty-five hours per year during the preceding credential period, at one or more chiropractic symposiums which are recognized and approved by the commission. The commission may, for good cause shown, waive said attendance. The following guidelines for such symposiums shall apply:

(1) The commission shall set criteria for the course content of educational symposia concerning matters which are recognized by the state of Washington chiropractic licensing laws; it shall be the licensee's responsibility to determine whether the course content meets these criteria;

(2) The commission shall adopt standards for distribution of annual continuing education credit requirements;

(3) Rules shall be adopted by the commission for licensees practicing and residing outside the state who shall meet all requirements established by rule of the commission.

[ 1996 c 191 s 9; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 114; 1991 c 3 s 40; 1989 c 258 s 5; 1985 c 7 s 17; 1980 c 51 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 22; 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 5; 1959 c 53 s 5; 1919 c 5 s 10; RRS s 10105.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 51: See note following RCW 18.25.025.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.